Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-834
Uniformity of application and construction.

Sections 76-825 to 76-894 shall be applied and construed so as to effectuate their general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of sections 76-825 to 76-894 among states enacting such sections.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 10.